Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
In General
§ 81-18-27.
Prohibited acts; licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender to broker residential mortgage loan only to licensed mortgage brokers or mortgage lenders or exempt persons [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

No person required to be licensed under this chapter shall:

Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device or artifice to defraud or mislead borrowers or lenders or to defraud any person.

Misrepresent to or conceal from an applicant for a mortgage loan or mortgagor, material facts, terms or conditions of a transaction to which the licensee is a party.

Fail to disburse funds in accordance with a written commitment or agreement to make a mortgage loan.

Fail to truthfully account for monies belonging to a party to a residential mortgage loan transaction.

Improperly refuse to issue a satisfaction of a mortgage loan.

Fail to account for or deliver to any person any personal property obtained in connection with a mortgage loan, such as money, funds, deposits, checks, drafts, mortgages or other documents or things of value that have come into the possession of the licensee and that are not the property of the licensee, or that the licensee is not by law or at equity entitled to retain.

Engage in any transaction, practice, or course of business that is not in good faith, or that operates a fraud upon any person in connection with the making of or purchase or sale of any mortgage loan, including the use of correction fluid on any document associated with the mortgage loan.

Engage in any fraudulent residential mortgage underwriting practices, which include, but are not limited to, making in any manner, any false or deceptive statement or representation including, with regard to the rates, points or other financing terms or conditions for a residential mortgage loan, or engage in bait and switch advertising.

Solicit or enter into a contract with a borrower that provides in substance that the person or individual subject to this chapter may earn a fee or commission through “best efforts” to obtain a loan even though no loan is actually obtained for the borrower.

Induce, require, or otherwise permit the applicant for a mortgage loan or mortgagor to sign a security deed, note, or other pertinent financial disclosure documents with any blank spaces to be filled in after it has been signed, except blank spaces relating to recording or other incidental information not available at the time of signing.

Make, directly or indirectly, any residential mortgage loan with the intent to foreclose on the borrower’s property. For purposes of this paragraph, there is a presumption that a person has made a residential mortgage loan with the intent to foreclose on the borrower’s property if any of the following circumstances are proven:

Lack of substantial benefit to the borrower;

The probability that full payment of the loan cannot be made by the borrower;

That the person has made a significant proportion of loans foreclosed under similar circumstances;

That the person has provided an extension of credit or collected a mortgage debt by extortion;

That the person does business under a trade name that misrepresents or tends to misrepresent that the person is a bank, trust company, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or insurance company.

Charge or collect any direct payment, compensation or advance fee from a borrower unless and until a loan is actually found, obtained and closed for that borrower, and in no event shall that direct payment, compensation or advance fee exceed seven and ninety-five one-hundredths percent (7.95%) of the original principal amount of the loan, and any such direct payments, compensation or advance fees shall be included in all annual percentage rate (APR) calculations if required under Regulation Z of the federal Truth in Lending Act (TILA). A direct payment, compensation or advance fee as defined in this section shall not include:

Any direct payment, compensation or advance fee collected by a licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender to be paid to a nonrelated third party;

Any indirect payment to a licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender by a lender if those fees are not required to be disclosed under the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act (RESPA);

Any indirect payment or compensation by a lender to a licensee required to be disclosed by the licensee under RESPA, provided that the payment or compensation is disclosed to the borrower by the licensee on a good faith estimate of costs, is included in the APR if required under Regulation Z of TILA, and is made pursuant to a written agreement between the licensee and the borrower as may be required by Section 81-18-33;

A fee not to exceed one percent (1%) of the principal amount of a loan for construction, provided that a binding commitment for the loan has been obtained for the prospective borrower; or

An advance fee, known as a lock-in fee, collected by a licensee to be paid to a lender to lock in an interest rate and/or a certain number of points on a mortgage loan from the lender as provided in Section 81-18-28.

Pay to any person not licensed under the provisions of this chapter any commission, bonus or fee in connection with arranging for or originating a mortgage loan for a borrower, except that a licensed loan originator may be paid a bonus, commission, or fee by his or her licensed employer.

Refuse to provide the loan payoff within three (3) business days of an oral or written request from a borrower or third party. Proof of authorization of the borrower shall be submitted for a third-party request. The payoff statement must be an understandable and accurate statement of the total amount that is required to pay off the mortgage loan as of a specified date. No borrower shall be charged a fee for being informed or receiving a payoff statement or for being provided with a release upon full payment, provided that the licensed mortgage lender may charge a reasonable fee for providing a payoff statement after five (5) or more requests in any calendar year.

Knowingly withhold, extract, remove, mutilate, destroy or conceal any books, records, computer records or other information which are required by law to be disclosed.

Negligently make any false statement or knowingly and willfully make any omission of material fact in connection with any information or reports filed with a governmental agency or the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or in connection with any investigation conducted by the commissioner or another governmental agency.

Fail to comply with this chapter or rules or regulations promulgated under this chapter, or fail to comply with any other state or federal law, including the rules and regulations under that law, applicable to any business authorized or conducted under this chapter.

Conduct any business covered by this chapter without holding a valid license as required under this chapter, or assist or aid and abet any person in the conduct of business under this chapter without a valid license as required under this chapter.

Make any payment, threat or promise, directly or indirectly, to any person for the purposes of influencing the independent judgment of the person in connection with a residential mortgage loan, or make any payment threat or promise, directly or indirectly, to any appraiser of a property, for the purposes of influencing the independent judgment of the appraiser with respect to the value of the property.

Solicit, advertise or enter into a contract for specific interest rates, points or other financing terms unless the terms are actually available at the time of soliciting, advertising or contracting.

Fail to make disclosures as required by this chapter and any other applicable state or federal law including regulations under that law.

Cause or require a borrower to obtain property insurance coverage in an amount that exceeds the replacement cost of the improvements as established by the property insurer.

Sign a consumer’s name to a mortgage loan application or mortgage loan documents on behalf of a consumer.

Knowingly falsify income or asset information on a mortgage loan application or mortgage loan documents.

Discourage a consumer in a mortgage loan transaction from seeking or obtaining independent legal counsel or legal advice.

A licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender shall only broker a residential mortgage loan to a mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensed under this chapter or to a person exempt from licensure under the provisions of this chapter.

No nonbanking entity may use any sign or handwritten or printed paper indicating that it is a bank, savings bank, trust company or place of banking. No entity may use the word “bank,” “savings bank,” “banking,” “banker” or “trust company,” or the equivalent or plural of any of these words, in connection with any business other than that of banking. This subsection does not prohibit a person from acting in a trust capacity.

No person shall use the name or logo of any banking entity in connection with the sale, offering for sale, or advertising of any financial product or service without the express written consent of the banking entity.

No unlicensed Mississippi location of a Mississippi licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender may advertise mortgage services if the unlicensed location is more than fifty (50) miles from a licensed Mississippi location.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 14; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 15; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 15; Laws, 2006, ch. 451, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 15; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 15; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-28.
Maximum lock-in fee; contents of lock-in fee agreement [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

A licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender may enter into lock-in agreements and collect a lock-in fee from a borrower on the lender’s behalf. The lock-in fee shall not exceed the following:

No fee may be collected to lock in for sixty (60) days or less;

One percent (1%) of the principal amount of the loan to lock in for more than sixty (60) days, but not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days;

One and one-half percent (1-1/2%) of the principal amount of the loan to lock in for more than one hundred eighty (180) days, but not to exceed two hundred seventy (270) days; or

Two percent (2%) of the principal amount of the loan to lock in for more than two hundred seventy (270) days.

Before the collection of a lock-in fee, the applicant must be provided a copy of the lock-in fee agreement. This agreement shall contain at least the following:

Identification of the property that is associated with the loan;

The principal amount and term of the loan;

The initial interest rate and/or points, whether the interest rate is fixed or variable, and if variable, the index and margin, or the method by which an interest rate change for the mortgage loan will be calculated;

The amount of the lock-in fee, whether the fee is refundable or nonrefundable, the time by which the lock-in fee must be paid to the lender, and if the fee is refundable, the terms and conditions necessary to obtain the refund; and

The length of the lock-in period that the agreement covers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 451, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 16; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-29.
Promulgation of rules and regulations [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

The commissioner shall promulgate those rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, necessary for the enforcement of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 16; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-31.
Regulations governing advertising of mortgage loans [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

The department shall promulgate regulations governing the advertising of mortgage loans, including, but not limited to, the following requirements:

That all advertisements for loans regulated under this chapter may not be false, misleading or deceptive. No person whose activities are regulated under this chapter may advertise in any manner so as to indicate or imply that its interest rates or charges for loans are “recommended,” “approved,” “set” or “established” by the State of Mississippi;

That all licensees shall maintain a copy of all advertisements citing interest rates or payment amounts primarily disseminated in this state and shall attach to each advertisement documentation that provides corroboration of the availability of the interest rate and terms of loans and names the specific media sources by which the advertisements were distributed;

That all published advertisements disseminated primarily in this state by a license shall contain the name and an office address of the licensee, which shall be the same as the name and address of the licensee on record with the department;

That an advertisement containing either a quoted interest rate or monthly payment amount must include:

The interest rate of the mortgage, a statement as to whether the rate is fixed or adjustable, and the adjustment index and frequency of adjustments;

The term in years or months to fully repay the mortgage;

The APR as computed under federal guidelines; and

That the unique identifier of any person originating a residential mortgage loan shall be clearly shown on all residential mortgage loan application forms, solicitations or advertisements, including business cards or websites, and any other documents as established by rule, regulation or order of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 16; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 17; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 17; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 18; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 18; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-33.
Required contents of individual borrower files and individual servicer files [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

The individual borrower files of a licensee shall contain at least the following:

A mortgage origination agreement provided to the borrower containing at least the following statements:

“As required by Mississippi Law, (licensed company name) has secured a bond issued by (name of insurance company), a surety company authorized to do business in this state. A certified copy of this bond is filed with the Mississippi Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance.”

“As a borrower you are protected under the Mississippi S.A.F.E. Mortgage Act.”

“Complaints against a licensee may be made by contacting the:

Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance

P.O. Drawer 12129

Jackson, MS 39236-2129”;

A copy of the original loan application signed and dated by the licensee;

A copy of the signed closing statement as required by HUD or documentation of denial or cancellation of the loan application;

A copy of the good-faith estimate of costs provided to the borrower;

A copy of the appraisal or statement of value if procured as a part of the loan application process;

A copy of a loan lock-in agreement, if any, provided by the licensee;

A copy of the disclosures required under Regulation Z of the federal Truth In Lending Act and other disclosures as required under federal regulations and evidence that those disclosures have been properly and timely made to the borrower; and

A copy of the final signed Uniform Residential Loan Application. However, any mortgage licensee who holds a license under the provisions of the Small Loan Regulatory Law, Section 75-67-101 et seq., and the Small Loan Privilege Tax Law, Section 75-67-201 et seq., may substitute an application that is otherwise compliant with federal and state law.

Additional information as required per the rules and regulations adopted by the commissioner according to Section 81-18-29.

The individual servicer files of a licensee shall contain at least the following:

A copy of the original initial loan application signed and dated by the licensee;

A copy of the final loan application signed and dated by the licensee;

A copy of the signed closing statement as required by HUD or documentation of denial or cancellation of the loan application;

Modification agreements;

Collection/default letters and related documentation;

Addendums, riders, assigned note, if applicable;

Complete pay history from the time the loan was transferred or boarded;

Complete comment/note history from the time the loan was transferred or boarded; and

Additional information as required per the rules and regulations of this chapter as deemed by the commissioner according to Section 81-18-29.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 18; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 18; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 19; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 17; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 19; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-35.
Journal of mortgage transactions for Mississippi residential loans that licensee originates and/or funds; journal of serviced loans for Mississippi residential loans that licensee owns and/or services [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Each licensee shall maintain a journal of mortgage transactions at the principal place of business as stated on its license for all Mississippi residential loans that the licensee originated and/or funded. This journal shall be separate from non-Mississippi loans. The journal shall include at least the following information:

Name of applicant and co-applicant, if applicable;

Date of application;

Disposition of loan application, indicating date of loan closing, loan denial, withdrawal and name of lender if applicable;

Property address;

Loan amount;

Terms;

Loan program; and

Loan originator.

Each licensee shall maintain a journal of serviced loans at the principal place of business as stated on its license, for all Mississippi residential loans that the licensee owns and/or services. This journal shall be kept separate from non-Mississippi loans. The journal shall include at least the following information:

The number of mortgage loans the licensee is servicing;

The type and characteristics of the loans;

The number of serviced loans in default, along with a breakdown of thirty-, sixty- and ninety-day delinquencies;

Information on loss mitigation activities, including details on workout arrangements undertaken and date loss mitigation application was submitted/approved/denied;

Information on foreclosures commenced and completed;

Name of applicant and co-applicant, if applicable; and

Date the loan was boarded/deboarded, if applicable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 19; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 21; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 20; Laws, 2013, ch. 499, § 8; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-36.
Funds paid to licensee for payment of taxes or insurance premiums must be deposited in separate account from funds belonging to licensee; account to be designated “escrow account”; accounting for funds [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

All monies paid to a licensee for payment of taxes, loan commitment deposits, work completion deposits, appraisals, credit reports or insurance premiums on property that secures any loan made or serviced by the licensee shall be deposited in an account that is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union Administration and shall be kept separate, distinct, and apart from funds belonging to the licensee.

The funds, when deposited, are to be designated as an “escrow account,” or under some other appropriate name, indicating that the funds are not the funds of the licensee.

The licensee shall, upon reasonable notice, account to any debtor whose property secures a loan made by the licensee for any funds which that person has paid to the licensee for the payment of taxes or insurance premiums on the property in question.

The licensee shall, upon reasonable notice, account to the commissioner for all funds in the company’s escrow account.

Escrow accounts are not subject to execution or attachment on any claim against the licensee.

It is unlawful for any licensee knowingly to keep or cause to be kept any funds or money in any bank or other financial institution under the heading of “escrow account” or any other name designating the funds or monies belonging to the debtors of the licensee, except actual funds paid to the licensee for the payment of taxes and insurance premiums on property securing loans made or serviced by the company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 20; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-37.
Suspension or revocation of license; notice to licensee [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

The department may suspend or revoke any license for any reason that would have been grounds for refusal to issue an original license or for:

A violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted under this chapter;

Failure of the licensee to pay, within thirty (30) days after it becomes final and nonappealable, a judgment recovered in any court within this state by a claimant or creditor in an action arising out of the licensee’s business in this state as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender.

Notice of the department’s intention to enter an order denying an application for a license under this chapter or of an order suspending or revoking a license under this chapter shall be given to the applicant, licensee in writing, sent by registered or certified mail addressed to the principal place of business of the applicant or licensee. Within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice of intention to enter an order of denial, suspension or revocation under this chapter, the applicant or licensee may request in writing a hearing to contest the order. If a hearing is not requested in writing within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice of intention, the department shall enter a final order regarding the denial, suspension or revocation. Any final order of the department denying, suspending or revoking a license shall state the grounds upon which it is based and shall be effective on the date of issuance. A copy of the final order shall be forwarded promptly by registered or certified mail addressed to the principal place of business of the applicant or licensee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 21; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 22; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 22; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-39.
Definition of “person”; violations of law; cease and desist orders; failure to comply with order; civil penalty [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

For purposes of this section, the term “person” shall be construed to include any officer, director, employee, affiliate or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of the person subject to the orders issued under this section.

If the department reasonably determines that a person required to be licensed under this chapter has violated any law of this state or any order or regulation of the department, the department may issue a written order requiring the person to cease and desist from unlawful or unauthorized practices. In the case of an unlawful purchase of mortgage loans, the cease and desist order to a purchaser shall constitute the knowledge required under this section for any subsequent violations.

Any person required to be licensed under this chapter who has been deemed by the commissioner, after notice and hearing, to have violated the terms of any order properly issued by the department under this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00). The department, in determining the amount of the penalty, shall take into account the appropriateness of the penalty relative to the size of the financial resources of the person, the good-faith efforts of the person to comply with the order, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations by the person, and other factors or circumstances that contributed to the violation. The department may compromise, modify or refund any penalty that has been imposed under this section. Any person assessed a penalty as provided in this subsection shall have the right to request a hearing on the amount of the penalty within ten (10) days after receiving notification of the assessment. If no hearing is requested within ten (10) days of the receipt of the notice, the penalty shall be final except as to judicial review in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County. Upon the filing of a petition for judicial review, the court shall issue an order to the licensee requiring the licensee to show cause why it should not be entered. If the court determines, after a hearing upon the merits or after failure of the person to appear when so ordered, that the order of the department was properly issued, it shall grant the penalty sought by the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 20; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 23; repealed by Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 24; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-40.
Commissioner authorized to issue subpoenas; penalties for noncompliance with subpoena [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

For the purpose of conducting investigations, examinations or other proceedings under this chapter, the commissioner or his designee may issue subpoenas to any individual, person or other entity for the production of all books, papers, records, files, documents or other things, and may subpoena and compel the attendance of witnesses to give testimony, and may administer oaths. Subpoenas as herein provided may be served either by personal process or by registered mail, and upon service shall command attendance of such witnesses, and/or production of such papers and documents, at the time and place so specified.

Any person or entity who fails or refuses to comply with a subpoena issued hereunder may be assessed by the commissioner a civil penalty of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each day of noncompliance, and any privileges or licenses issued by the commissioner to the person or entity may be suspended for not more than six (6) months. In addition to the civil penalty, the commissioner shall be entitled to the assistance of the chancery court or the chancellor in vacation, which, on petition by the commissioner or his designee, shall issue ancillary subpoenas and petitions and may punish as for contempt of court in the event of noncompliance therewith, and assess attorney’s fees and costs, if deemed appropriate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 434, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-41.
Continuation of loan servicing under existing servicing contracts by suspended licensee [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a person whose license has been suspended or revoked from continuing to service mortgage loans pursuant to servicing contracts in existence at the time of the suspension or revocation for a reasonable transition period, as determined by the commissioner, after the date of the entry of the final decision in the case suspending or revoking the license.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 23; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-43.
Penalties for violations; report of violations; hearing on amount of penalty; judicial review [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

In order to ensure the effective supervision and enforcement of this chapter, the commissioner may:

Deny, suspend, revoke, condition or decline to renew a license for a violation of this chapter, rules or regulations issued under this chapter or order or directive entered under this chapter.

Deny, suspend, revoke, condition or decline to renew a license if an applicant or licensee fails at any time to meet the requirements of Section 81-18-9(4) or 81-18-15(2), or withholds information or makes a material misstatement in an application for a license or renewal of a license.

Order restitution against persons subject to this chapter for violations of this chapter.

Impose civil penalties on persons subject to this chapter under subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

Issue orders or directives under this chapter as follows:

Order or direct persons subject to this chapter to cease and desist from conducting business, including immediate temporary orders to cease and desist.

Order or direct persons subject to this chapter to cease any harmful activities or violations of this chapter, including immediate temporary orders to cease and desist.

Enter immediate temporary orders to cease business under a license issued under the authority granted under Section 81-18-7(6) if the commissioner determines that the license was erroneously granted or the licensee is currently in violation of this chapter.

Order or direct such other affirmative action as the commissioner deems necessary.

The commissioner may impose a civil penalty on a mortgage loan originator or person subject to this chapter, if the commissioner finds, on the record after notice and opportunity for hearing, that the mortgage loan originator or person subject to this chapter has violated or failed to comply with any requirement of this chapter or any regulation prescribed by the commissioner under this chapter or order issued under authority of this chapter. The maximum amount of penalty for each act or omission described in this subsection shall be Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00).

Each violation or failure to comply with any directive or order of the commissioner is a separate and distinct violation or failure.

For a first offense, the licensee, person required to be licensed, or employee may be found guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year.

For a second or subsequent offense, the licensee, person required to be licensed, or employee shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, may be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the State Department of Corrections for a term not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years.

Compliance with the criminal provisions of this section shall be enforced by the appropriate law enforcement agency, which may exercise for that purpose any authority conferred upon the agency by law.

The commissioner shall report regularly violations of this chapter, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry subject to the provisions contained in Section 81-18-63.

The state may enforce its rights under the surety bond as required in Section 81-18-11 as an available remedy for the collection of any civil penalties, criminal fines or costs of investigation and/or prosecution incurred.

Any person assessed a penalty as provided in this section shall have the right to request a hearing on the amount of the penalty within ten (10) days after receiving notification of the assessment. If no hearing is requested within ten (10) days of the receipt of the notice, the penalty shall be final except as to judicial review in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County. Upon the filing of a petition for judicial review, the court shall issue an order to the licensee requiring the licensee to show cause why it should not be entered. If the court determines, after a hearing upon the merits or after failure of the person to appear when so ordered, that the order of the department was properly issued, it shall grant the penalty sought by the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 24; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 24; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 25; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-45.
Commissioner authorized to hire additional full-time employees [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

The commissioner may employ the necessary full-time employees above the number of permanent full-time employees authorized for the department for the fiscal year 2001, to carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner also may expend the necessary funds and equip and provide necessary travel expenses for those employees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-47.
Immunity from liability [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

A licensee under this chapter shall have no liability for any act or practice done or omitted in conformity with (a) any rule or regulation of the commissioner, or (b) any rule, regulation, interpretation or approval of any other state or federal agency or any opinion of the Attorney General, notwithstanding that after such act or omission has occurred the rule, regulation, interpretation, approval or opinion is amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

A licensee under this chapter, acting in conformity with a written interpretation or approval by an official or employee of any state or federal agency or department, shall be presumed to have acted in accordance with applicable law, notwithstanding that after such act has occurred, the interpretation or approval is amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be incorrect or invalid for any reason.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-49.
Grandfather provisions [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter to the contrary, mortgage companies engaging in business on or before June 1, 2000, shall be duly licensed by the department after submitting not later than January 1, 2001, the required documents and fees provided in Sections 81-18-9 and 81-18-15. However, upon the expiration of the initial licenses for such mortgage companies, the department shall renew the licenses only if the mortgage companies satisfy all of the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-51.
Repeal of §§ 81-18-1 through 81-18-63 [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

Sections 81-18-1 through 81-18-63 shall stand repealed on July 1, 2020.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 579, § 27; Laws, 2002, ch. 500, § 28; Laws, 2004, ch. 364, § 28; Laws, 2007, ch. 581, § 29; Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 20; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 31; Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 27; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 81-18-53.
Applicability of chapter [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to the activities of retail sellers of manufactured homes to the extent as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development through guidelines, rules, regulations or interpretive letters or the United States Consumer Financial Protection Bureau.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 544, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 462, § 28; Laws, 2011, ch. 386, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 571, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 360, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 2016.